Utah statutes.
3-1-12.1.   Quorum -- Voting.

(1)  The bylaws of the association shall prescribe the number of members or shareholders which constitutes a quorum.

(2)  Where a quorum was initially present at a meeting, a majority vote of the votes entitled to be cast shall be necessary for the adoption of any matter on which a vote was cast, unless a greater proportion is required by this chapter or the articles of incorporation of the association.

(3)  If the articles of incorporation require the vote of a greater proportion of members than that required by this chapter, the provisions of the articles of incorporation shall control.

